Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2006
Prospective application.

(a) Except as extended by subsection (b) of this section, the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities Act applies to a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment that is created on or after August 25, 1989. For purposes of this section, a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment created by the exercise of a power of appointment is created when the power is irrevocably exercised or when a revocable exercise becomes irrevocable.

(b) If a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment was created before August 25, 1989, and is determined in a judicial proceeding, commenced on or after such date, to violate this state's rule against perpetuities as that rule existed before such date, a county court in a proceeding described in section 30-2211 or 30-3812 or a district court upon the petition of an interested person may reform the disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor's manifested plan of distribution and is within the limits of the rule against perpetuities applicable when the nonvested property interest or power of appointment was created.

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 139.